California statutes. Vehicle Code
 department as a negligent operator or the equivalent of that in the state that issued the driver’s license.

(7) Have a driver record that does not have an outstanding notice for violating a written promise to appear in court or for willfully failing to pay a lawfully imposed fine, as provided in former Section 40509 or former Section 40509.5 or as provided in equivalent statutes in the state that issued the driver’s license.

(8) Be 18 years of age or older.

(9) Be sponsored by an all-terrain vehicle safety training organization.

(b) The qualifying requirements in this section shall be met within one year from the date of application for a license, or a new application, examination, and a fee shall be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 6.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11104.5.

Each applicant for a license as a driving school owner, driving school operator, or driving instructor shall submit an application to the department on the forms prescribed by the department. The applicant shall provide the department with any information concerning the applicant’s character, honesty, integrity, and reputation which the department may consider necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 75, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11104.6.

Each applicant for a license or for renewal of a license under this chapter shall submit an application to the department on the forms prescribed by the department. The applicant shall provide the department any information concerning the applicant’s character, honesty, integrity, and reputation which the department considers to be necessary.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 9.   Section operative July 1, 1988, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.

(a) The department shall issue a license certificate to each driving school owner and to each driving school operator when it is satisfied that the owner has met the qualifications required under this chapter. The license shall be for a period of one year from midnight of the last day of the month of issuance unless canceled, suspended, or revoked by the department.

(b) The license shall be renewed annually. The department shall require all of the following for the renewal of the license:

(1) Compliance with the provisions of Sections 11102 and 11105.2 for renewal of a driving school owner’s license or Section 11102.5, except paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11102.5, for renewal of a driving school operator’s license.

(2) Satisfactory completion of an examination as provided in Section 11102.5 at least once during each succeeding three-year period after the initial issuance of a license certificate.

In lieu of any examination for renewal of the license, the department may accept submission by the licensee of evidence of continuing professional education. Professional education, as used in this subdivision, means satisfactory completion of courses related to traffic safety, teaching techniques, or the teaching of driver instruction acceptable to the department or participation in professional seminars approved by the department.

(c) The department may issue a probationary license and certificate subject to conditions to be observed by the licensee in the exercise of the privilege granted. The conditions to be attached to the exercise of the privilege shall not appear on the face of the license or certificate but shall be such as may, in the judgment of the department, be in the public interest and suitable to the qualifications of the applicant as disclosed by the application and investigation by the department of the information contained therein.

(d) Upon notification of death of a driving school licensee the department may issue a certificate of convenience to the executor, executrix, administrator or administratrix of the estate of a deceased holder of a validly outstanding certificate to conduct a driving school, or if no executor, executrix, administrator or administratrix has been appointed, and until a certified copy of an order making such appointment is filed with the department, to the surviving spouse or other heir otherwise entitled to conduct the business of the deceased, permitting such person to conduct the driving school for a period of one year from and after the date of death, and necessary one-year renewals thereafter pending, but not later than, disposal of the business and qualification of the vendee of the business or such surviving spouse or heir for a license certificate to conduct a driving school under the provisions of this division. The department may restrict or condition the certificate and attach to the exercise of the privilege thereunder such terms and conditions as in its judgment the protection of the public requires.

(e) The department shall not issue or renew a license certificate unless it determines that the driving school owner has complied with Section 11103.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.1.

(a) The department shall issue a license certificate to each driving school instructor and to each all-terrain vehicle safety instructor when it is satisfied that the person has met the qualifications required under this chapter. The original instructor’s license and any instructor’s license renewed pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) is valid for three years from the date issued unless canceled, suspended, or revoked by the department.

(b) A licensee may apply for the renewal of an instructor’s license prior to the expiration date of the license. In no event shall an instructor renew the license after the date of expiration.

(c) The department shall require all of the following for the renewal of the instructor’s license:

(1) Compliance with Section 11104, except subdivision (c) thereof, for a driving school instructor, or compliance with Section 11104.3, except paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) thereof, for an all-terrain vehicle safety instructor, and, for either, compliance with Section 11105.2.

(2) Satisfactory completion of an examination as provided in Section 11104 or 11104.3, as applicable, at least once during each succeeding three-year period after the initial issuance of an instructor license certificate.

In lieu of any examination for renewal of the license, the department may accept submission by the licensee of evidence of continuing professional education as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 11105.

(d) The department may issue a probationary instructor’s license and certificate subject to conditions to be observed by the licensee in the exercise of the privilege granted. The conditions to be attached to the exercise of the privilege shall not appear on the face of the license or certificate, but shall be such as may, in the judgment of the department, be in the public interest and suitable to the qualifications of the applicant as disclosed by the application and investigation by the department of the information contained therein.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1988.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 10) and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 11.   Section operative July 1, 1988, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.2.

(a) The fee for a license issued to a driving school owner or to an all-terrain vehicle safety training organization shall be as follows:

(1) For the original license, or an ownership change which requires a new application, except as provided by Section 42231, a nonrefundable fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(2) For the annual renewal of a license, a fee of fifty dollars ($50).

(3) If an alteration of an existing license is caused by a firm name change, a change in corporate officer structure, address change, or the addition of a branch location, a fee of seventy dollars ($70).

(4) For replacement of the license when the original license is lost, stolen, or mutilated, a fee of fifteen dollars ($15).

(b) The fee for a license issued to a driving school operator shall be as follows:

(1) For the original license a nonrefundable fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) For the annual renewal of a license, a fee of one hundred dollars ($100). 

(3) If an alteration of an existing license is caused by a change in school name or location, or the addition of a branch location, a fee of fifteen dollars ($15).

(4) For replacement of the license when the original license is lost, stolen, or mutilated, a fee of fifteen dollars ($15).

(c) The fee for a license issued to a driving school instructor or to an all-terrain vehicle safety instructor shall be as follows:

(1) For the original license, except as provided by Section 42231, a nonrefundable fee of thirty dollars ($30).

(2) For the triennial renewal of a license, a fee of thirty dollars ($30).

(3) If an alteration of an existing license is caused by a change in the instructor’s employing school’s name or location, or transfer of the instructor’s license to another employing school, a fee of fifteen dollars ($15).

(4) For the replacement of the instructor’s license when the original license is lost, stolen, or mutilated, a fee of fifteen dollars ($15).

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1988.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 12) and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 13.   Section operative July 1, 1988, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.3.

Any school owner, operator, or instructor required to be licensed under this chapter who fails to renew the license prior to the expiration of the license in accordance with Sections 11105 and 11105.1 and whose license was not canceled, suspended, or revoked by the department at the time of expiration, may reapply for an original license pursuant to Section 11102, 11102.5, 11104, or 11104.3.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1988.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 14) and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 15.   Section operative July 1, 1988, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.5.

The department shall issue an independent driving instructor’s license to permit instruction in any city with a population of less than 50,000, which does not have within it an established licensed driving school, to any person who meets the requirements of this chapter relating to instructor’s and independent instructor’s licenses, even though such person is not an employee of, or otherwise associated with or instructing through, a driving school, except that no independent driving instructor’s license shall be issued to a person to instruct in counties with a population in excess of 400,000. In addition, an independent instructor must at all times be employed as an accredited teacher of automobile driver education or automobile driver training under the provisions of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.6.

(a) The department shall issue a license to an all-terrain vehicle safety training organization when the department is satisfied that the organization has met the qualifications required under this chapter and has been approved and certified by the Off-Highway Vehicle Safety Education Committee. The license shall be valid for a period of one year from midnight of the last day of the month of issuance unless canceled, suspended, or revoked by the department.

(b) The license shall be renewed annually. The department shall require compliance with Sections 11102 and 11105.2 for the renewal of the license.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 16.   Section operative July 1, 1988, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11106.

(a) Until the department is satisfied that the applicant has met the requirements under this chapter, it may issue a temporary permit to any person applying for a license issued pursuant to this chapter. The temporary permit authorizes the operation of a school or the giving of instruction for a period not to exceed 120 days while the department is completing its investigation and determination of all facts relative to the qualifications of the applicant for the license.

(b) A temporary permit valid for 30 days may be issued to any applicant for an original instructor’s license pending satisfactory completion of the course required by subdivision (b) of Section 11104 or paragraph 2 of subdivision (a) of Section 11104.3, as applicable. This subdivision does not extend the period of validity of any temporary permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The department may cancel a temporary permit when it has determined, or has reasonable cause to believe, that the application is incorrect or incomplete or the temporary permit was issued in error. A temporary permit is invalid when canceled or when the applicant’s license has been issued or refused.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1988.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 17) and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 18.   Section operative July 1, 1988, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11107.

(a) The department may refuse to issue a license certificate under this chapter to any applicant to own or operate a school or to any instructor when it finds and determines any of the following to exist:

(1) The applicant has not met the qualifications required under this chapter.

(2) The applicant was previously the holder of a license under this chapter which was revoked or suspended, which was never reissued by the department after revocation, or which was never reinstated after suspension.

(3) The applicant was previously the holder of an occupational license issued by another state, authorizing the same or similar activities of a license issued under this division; and that license was revoked or suspended for cause and was never reissued, or was suspended for cause, and the terms of suspension have not been fulfilled.

(4) The applicant has done any act or series of acts which would be a cause for suspension or revocation under Section 11110.

(5) If the applicant is a business, a business representative was the holder of a revoked or suspended license previously issued under this chapter which was never reissued after revocation or which was never reinstated after suspension, or a business representative, though not previously the holder of a license, has done any act or series of acts which would be a cause for revocation or suspension under Section 11110.

(6) By reason of the facts and circumstances relating to the organization, control, and management of the business, it is likely that the policy or operation of the business will be directed, controlled, or managed by a business representative who, by reason of any act, series of acts, or conduct described in paragraph (4) or (5), would be ineligible for a license and that, by licensing the business, the purposes of this division would be defeated.

(7) The applicant has knowingly made a false statement or knowingly concealed a material fact in applying for a license.

(8) The applicant, or one of the business representatives if the applicant is a business, has been convicted of a crime, or has committed any act or engaged in conduct involving moral turpitude, which is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensed activity. A conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is a conviction within the meaning of this section.

(b) Upon refusal of the department to issue a license, the applicant may demand, in writing, a hearing before the director or the director’s representative within 60 days after notice of refusal.

The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) A person whose license has been revoked, or whose application for a license has been refused, may reapply for the license after a period of not less than one year has elapsed from the effective date of the decision revoking the license or refusing the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11108.

(a) Every person licensed under this chapter shall keep a record showing all of the following:

(1) The name and address and license number of the school.

(2) The name and address of each person given instruction.

(3) Excepting all-terrain vehicle safety training organizations, the instruction permit number or driver’s license number of every person given instruction in the driving of a motor vehicle.

(4) Excepting all-terrain vehicle safety training organizations, the date any instruction permit was issued.

(5) The name and instructor’s license number of each instructor.

(6) The particular type of instruction given and the date of the instruction. 

(7) The amount of time devoted to each type of instruction.

(8) The total number of hours of instruction.

(9) The total cost to the student of the instruction.

(b) The records shall be retained for at least three years and shall be open to the inspection of the department at all reasonable times, but shall be only for the confidential use of the department.

(c) Whenever the licensee suspends or terminates the licensed activity, the licensee shall surrender the records to the department for examination not later than the end of the third day, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after the date of suspension or termination. The department may duplicate or make a record of any information contained in the licensee’s records. All of the licensee’s records shall be returned to the licensee not later than 30 days after the date of surrender.

(d) Every all-terrain vehicle safety training organization shall maintain records for all-terrain vehicle safety instructors who are authorized to offer that organization’s courses of instruction.

(e) Each all-terrain vehicle safety instructor shall report the information required under this section to the all-terrain vehicle safety training organization no later than the 15th day of the month following the date instruction was provided. Instructors shall notify the organization, which shall, in turn, notify the department at least 30 days in advance of providing a course of instruction, of the time, date, location, and type of instruction to be given.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1988.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 21) and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 22.   Section operative July 1, 1988, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11108.5.

(a) Every school owner licensed pursuant to this chapter shall notify the department within 10 days of any change in the ownership or corporate structure of the licensee.

(b) Every school owner licensed pursuant to this chapter shall immediately notify the department upon changing the site or location of the school’s established place of business.

(c) Every school operator and every instructor licensed pursuant to this chapter shall report to the department every change of residence address within five days of the change.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1988.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 23) and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 24.   Section operative July 1, 1988, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11109.

Every licensee under this chapter shall maintain all vehicles used in driver training in safe mechanical condition at all times.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11110.

(a) The department, after notice and hearing, may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter if any of the following occurs:

(1) The department finds and determines that the licensee fails to meet the requirements to receive or hold a license under this chapter.

(2) The licensee fails to keep the records required by this chapter.

(3) The licensee (A) permits fraud or engages in fraudulent practices either with reference to an applicant for a driver’s license or an all-terrain vehicle safety certificate from the department, or (B) induces or countenances fraud or fraudulent practices on the part of an applicant.

(4) The licensee fails to comply with this chapter or regulation or requirement of the department adopted pursuant thereto.

(5) The licensee represents himself or herself as an agent or employee of the department or uses advertising designed to create the impression, or that would reasonably have the effect of leading persons to believe, that the licensee is in fact an employee or representative of the department; or the licensee makes an advertisement, in any manner or by any means, that is untrue or misleading and that is known, or that by the exercise of reasonable care should be known, to be untrue or misleading.

(6) The licensee, or an employee or agent of the licensee, solicits driver training or instruction or all-terrain vehicle safety instruction in, or within 200 feet of, an office of the department.

(7) The licensee is convicted of violating Section 14606, 20001, 20002, 20003, 20004, 20006, 20008, 23103, 23104, 23105, 23152, or 23153 of this code or subdivision (b) of Section 191.5 or subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code. A conviction, after a plea of nolo contendere, is a conviction within the meaning of this paragraph.

(8) The licensee teaches, or permits a student to be taught, the specific tests administered by the department through use of the department’s forms or testing facilities.

(9) The licensee conducts training, or permits training by an employee, in an unsafe manner or contrary to safe driving practices.

(10) The licensed school owner or licensed driving school operator teaches, or permits an employee to teach, driving instruction or all-terrain vehicle safety instruction without a valid instructor’s license.

(11) The licensed school owner does not have in effect a bond as required by Section 11102.

(12) The licensee permits the use of the license by any other person for the purpose of permitting that person to engage in the ownership or operation of a school or in the giving of driving instruction or all-terrain vehicle safety instruction for compensation.

(13) The licensee holds a secondary teaching credential and explicitly or implicitly recruits or attempts to recruit a pupil who is enrolled in a junior or senior high school to be a customer for a business licensed pursuant to this article that is owned by the licensee or for which the licensee is an employee.

(b) In the interest of the public’s safety, as determined by the department, the department may immediately suspend the license of a licensee for an alleged violation under this chapter and shall conduct a hearing of the alleged violation within 30 days of the suspension.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 747, Sec. 14.5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

11110.1.

Any of the causes specified in this chapter as a cause for refusal to issue a license under this chapter is cause to suspend or revoke a license under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

11110.2.

The license issued to a school owner shall be automatically canceled upon the happening of any of the following:

(a) The abandonment of the established place of business or the change thereof without notice to the department pursuant to Section 11108.5.

(b) The failure to maintain an adequate bond or to procure and file another bond, as required by Section 11102, prior to the effective date of the termination by the surety of any existing bond.

(c) The voluntary or involuntary surrender of the license, except that a surrender or cessation of business by the licensee, or the suspension or revocation of the corporate status of the licensee, does not preclude the department from filing an accusation for revocation or suspension of the surrendered license, as provided in Section 11110, or affect the department’s decision to suspend or revoke the license.

(d) Notification to the department that the person designated as licensee has changed.

(e) Suspension or revocation of the corporate status of the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

11110.5.

The department may cancel any license issued under this chapter when that license has been issued in error or voluntarily surrendered to the department for cancellation. Whenever a driving school operator’s license or an instructor’s license is canceled, it shall be without prejudice and shall be surrendered to the department. Any person whose license has been canceled may immediately apply for a license, and the application may be accepted without additional fee or examination under rules and regulations adopted by the department.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1988.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 29) and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 30.   Section operative July 1, 1988, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11110.7.

(a) The department, after notice and hearing, on an interim basis, may refuse to issue or may suspend a license issued under this chapter when the applicant or licensee, or a business representative if the applicant or licensee is a business, has been convicted of a crime involving moral turpitude which is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensed activity, if an appeal of the conviction is pending or the conviction has otherwise not become final. A conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is a conviction within the meaning of this section.

(b) If a conviction, upon which an interim refusal to issue or suspension under subdivision (a) is based, is affirmed on appeal or otherwise becomes final, the refusal to issue or the suspension shall automatically become effective as a denial or revocation, as the case may be, of the license. If the interim refusal to issue or the suspension was stayed under probationary terms and conditions, the subsequent automatic denial or revocation shall also be stayed under the same terms and conditions for a term not to exceed the original term of probation for the interim refusal to issue or suspension.

(c) If a conviction, upon which an interim refusal to issue or suspension under subdivision (a) is based, is reversed on appeal, the department shall set aside immediately that refusal or suspension.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

11111.

(a) Every licensee under this chapter is entitled to notice and hearing prior to cancellation, suspension, or revocation of the license by the department, except that the department shall immediately cancel the license without a hearing for failure of the licensee to meet and maintain the requirements of paragraph (1), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 11102, or Section 11103 or 11103.1, or paragraph (4), (5), or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 11104, or paragraph (4), (5), or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 11104.3, or Section 11110.2.

(b) The notice and hearings provided for in this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) Any action of the department in suspending, canceling, or revoking, or failing to renew a license may be reviewed by any court of competent jurisdiction. 

(d) The department may, pending a hearing, temporarily suspend the license or permit of any person licensed under this chapter for not more than 30 days if the director finds that the action is required in the public interest. In that case, a hearing shall be held and a decision issued within 30 days after notice of the temporary suspension.

(e) The suspension, expiration, or cancellation of a license issued under this chapter does not preclude the filing of an accusation for the revocation or suspension of the suspended, expired, or canceled license as provided in Section 11110, and does not invalidate or otherwise preclude a decision by the department to suspend or revoke the license. That determination may be considered in granting or refusing to grant any subsequent license authorized by this chapter to the same licensee, or to any partner, officer, director, or stockholder of the same licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11111.2.

Any owner licensed under this chapter who has closed his or her established place of business or any operator or instructor currently or previously licensed under this chapter who no longer resides at the address last filed with the department, may be served with process issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code by registered mail at that place of business, in the case of an owner, or at that residence, in the case of an operator or instructor, unless the person has notified the department in writing of another address where service may be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 751, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11111.5.

(a) After the filing of an accusation under this chapter, the director may enter into a stipulated compromise settlement agreement with the consent of the licensee on terms and conditions mutually agreeable to the director, the respondent licensee, and the accuser without further hearing or appeal. The agreement may include, but is not limited to, a period of probation or monetary penalties, or both. The monetary penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for driving school owners or for a principal in an all-terrain vehicle safety training organization or five hundred dollars ($500) for driving school operators or for driving instructors or all-terrain vehicle safety instructors for each violation, and the monetary penalty shall be based on the nature of the violation and the effect of the violation on the purposes of this chapter.

(b) A compromise settlement agreement may be entered before, during, or after the hearing, but is valid only if executed and filed pursuant to subdivision (d) before the proposed decision of the hearing officer, if any, is adopted or the case is decided.

(c) The department shall adopt, by regulation, a schedule of maximum and minimum amounts of monetary penalties, the payment of which may be included as a term or condition of a compromise settlement agreement entered under subdivision (a). Any monetary penalty included in a compromise settlement agreement shall be within the range of monetary penalties in that schedule.

(d) Any compromise settlement agreement entered under this section shall be signed by the director, the respondent licensee, and the accuser, or by their authorized representatives. The director shall file, or cause to be filed, the agreement with the Office of Administrative Hearings, together with the department’s notice of withdrawal of the accusation or statement of issues upon which the action was initiated.

(e) If the respondent licensee fails to perform all of the terms and conditions of the compromise settlement agreement, the agreement is void and the department may take any action authorized by law notwithstanding the agreement, including, but not limited to, refiling the accusation or imposing license sanctions.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1988.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 33) and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 881, Sec. 34.   Section operative July 1, 1988, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11112.

Upon refusal of the department to issue a license, the applicant shall be entitled to demand in writing a hearing before the director or his representative within 60 days after notice of refusal.

The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing at Section 11500), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11113.

(a) The director may prescribe rules and regulations for driving schools regarding the conduct of courses of driver education and driver training, including curriculum, facilities, and equipment. The rules and regulations regarding curriculum shall require all the following:

(1) A component relating to the dangers involved in consuming alcohol or drugs in connection with the operation of a motor vehicle.

(2) A component examining driver attitude and motivation that focuses on the reduction of future driving violations, with particular emphasis on aggressive driving behavior and
 behavior commonly known as “road rage.”

(3) Viewing the Department of Justice’s video on proper conduct during a traffic stop created pursuant to Section 1656.1.

(b) The director may also prescribe rules and regulations for the conduct of driving instructor training courses required by Sections 11102.5 and 11104, including curriculum, facilities, and equipment. The department shall monitor instruction given by driving schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 332, Sec. 3.   (AB 2537)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11113.3.

The rules and regulations adopted pursuant to Section 11113 regarding the curriculum shall include, but are not limited to, the rights and duties of a motorist as they relate to traffic laws and traffic safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 833, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11113.5.

The department shall establish rules and regulations prescribing standards for the licensing and control, as provided in this chapter, of owners, operators, and instructors and the courses of driver education and driver training for driving schools providing training courses for class 1 and class 2 licensed drivers. The standards shall provide for requirements of licensing, training, and control to assure that the owners, operators, and instructors are qualified to provide the type of training needed by drivers for safe operation of large commercial vehicles on the highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 387, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11114.

The department may require any person licensed under this chapter to submit to a reexamination of his qualifications when there is reasonable cause to believe that the licensee does not have the ability to give driving instruction. If the licensee refuses or fails to submit to such reexamination, the department may peremptorily suspend his license until such time as the licensee shall have submitted to reexamination. The suspension shall be effective upon notice.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 703.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Traffic Violator Schools [11200. - 11223.]

11200.

(a) The department shall license schools for traffic violators for purposes of Section 41501 or 42005 and to provide traffic safety instruction to other persons who elect to attend. A person may not own or operate a traffic violator school or, except as provided in Section 11206, give instruction for compensation in a traffic violator school without a currently valid license issued by the department.

(b) (1) Any person who elects to attend a traffic violator school shall receive from the traffic violator school and shall sign a copy of the following consumer disclosure statement prior to the payment of the school fee and attending the school:
“Course content is limited to traffic violator curricula approved by the
 Department of Motor Vehicles. Students in the classroom include traffic offenders, repeat traffic offenders, adults, and teenagers, and those who have and those who have not been referred by a court. Instructor training, business regulatory standards, and Vehicle Code requirements of traffic violator schools are not equal to the training, standards, and Vehicle Code requirements of licensed driving schools (California Vehicle Code Section 11200(b)(1)).”
(2) In the case of a minor who elects to attend a traffic violator school, the minor’s parent or guardian shall sign the consumer disclosure statement.

(3) A copy of each signed disclosure statement shall be retained by the traffic violator school for a minimum of 36 months.

(c) New and modified departmental regulations
 necessitated by this section shall be adopted and effective no later than September 1, 2011.

(d) A licensed traffic violator school shall notify the court by posting on the department’s Web-based database established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11205 information regarding successful course completions.

(e) A licensed traffic violator school shall give every person who attends the school for purposes of Sections 41501 or 42005, upon successful completion of the lesson plan and passage of the postlesson knowledge test, a receipt indicating successful completion. The receipt shall include contact information, including the name of the traffic violator school, address of the school’s business location, name of the course instructor if classroom-based, telephone number, e-mail address if appropriate, hours of operation, and any other information that may be used to confirm
 course completion.

(f) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2011.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 599, Sec. 3.5.   (AB 2499)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Section operative September 1, 2011, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11202.

(a) A traffic violator school owner shall meet all of the following criteria before a license may be issued for the traffic violator school:

(1) Maintain an established place of business in this state that is open to the public. An office or place of business of a traffic violator school, including any traffic violator school branch or classroom location, shall not be situated within 500 feet of any court of law or within 50 feet of another licensed traffic violator school. The office or place of business shall be a separate and enclosed space consisting of a minimum of 100 square feet and shall have a lockable entry door.

(2) Be open to the public and maintain regular business hours Monday to Friday,
 inclusive, excluding state and federal holidays. The business hours shall be posted at the established place of business and on any internet website used or maintained by the traffic violator school.

(3) Have an operator or employee in each office or place of business during regular business hours.

(4) Have a name that does not include a cost, price, or amount of the traffic violator school course, unless that name accurately reflects the cost of the course.

(5) Conform to standards established by regulation of the department. In adopting the standards, the department shall consider those practices and instructional programs that may reasonably foster the knowledge, skills, and judgment necessary for compliance with traffic laws. The department shall establish standards for each instructional modality, which may